District of Columbia statutes.
42-1742

Repealed

Licensure of real estate brokers, real estate salespersons, and property managers.

Repealed.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 7, 30 DCR 390
Sept. 26, 1984, D.C. Law 5-117, § 2(e), 31 DCR 4023
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1233(f), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 45-1926.